test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-cavos_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - čavos: # 2B
    čavos+N+Sg+Nom: čavos
    čavos+N+Sg+Gen: čappoos
    čavos+N+Sg+Acc: čappoos
    čavos+N+Sg+Ill: čaposân
    čavos+N+Sg+Loc: čaposist
    čavos+N+Sg+Com: čaposáin
    čavos+N+Sg+Abe: čappoosttáá
    čavos+N+Ess: čavosin                #čaposin
    čavos+N+Par: čavosid                #čaposid
    čavos+N+Pl+Nom: čaposeh
    čavos+N+Pl+Gen: čaposij
    čavos+N+Pl+Acc: čaposijd
    čavos+N+Pl+Ill: čaposáid
    čavos+N+Pl+Loc: čaposijn
    čavos+N+Pl+Com: čaposijguin
    čavos+N+Pl+Abe: čaposijttáá
